California statutes. Corporations Code
 (commencing with Section 31520) or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 31200) of Part 3 shall be liable to the franchisor, who may sue for damages or may assert claims of indemnity against the franchise broker caused by the violation, including, but not limited to, indemnity for any damages awarded in connection with rescission awarded to the
 franchisee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 518, Sec. 3.   (SB 919)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

31301.

Any person who violates Section 31201 shall be liable to any person (not knowing or having cause to believe that such statement was false or misleading) who, while relying upon such statement shall have purchased a franchise, for damages, unless the defendant proves that the plaintiff knew the facts concerning the untruth or omission or that the defendant exercised reasonable care and did not know, (or if he had exercised reasonable care would not have known) of the untruth or omission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31302.

Every person who directly or indirectly controls a person liable under Section 31300 or 31301, every partner in a firm so liable, every principal executive officer or director of a corporation so liable, every person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, every employee of a person so liable who materially aids in the act or transaction constituting the violation, are also liable jointly and severally with and to the same extent as such person, unless the other person who is so liable had no knowledge of or reasonable grounds to believe in the existence of the facts by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31302.5.

(a) Any person who violates Section 31220 may be sued in the superior court in the county in which the defendant resides or where a franchise affected by the violation does business, for temporary and permanent injunctive relief and for damages, if any, and the costs of suit, including reasonable attorneys’ fees. A plaintiff shall not be required to allege or prove that actual damages have been suffered in order to obtain injunctive relief.

(b) No action shall be maintained to enforce any liability created under Section 31220 unless brought before the expiration of two years after the violation upon which it is based or the expiration of one year after the discovery by the plaintiff of the facts constituting such violation, whichever occurs first.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 510.)
-------------------------------------------

31303.

No action shall be maintained to enforce any liability created under Section 31300 unless brought before the expiration of four years after the act or transaction constituting the violation, the expiration of one year after the discovery by the plaintiff of the fact constituting the violation, or 90 days after delivery to the franchisee of a written notice disclosing any violation of Section 31110 or 31200, which notice shall be approved as to form by the commissioner, whichever shall first expire.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31304.

No action shall be maintained to enforce any liability created under Section 31301 unless brought before the expiration of two years after the violation upon which it is based, expiration of one year after the discovery by the plaintiff of the facts constituting such violation, or 90 days after delivery to the franchisee of a written notice disclosing any violation of Section 31201 or 31202 which notice shall be approved as to form by the commissioner, whichever shall first expire.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31305.

Every cause of action under this chapter survives the death of any person who might have been a plaintiff or defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31306.

Nothing in this chapter shall limit any liability which may exist by virtue of any other statute or under common law if this law were not in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 728, Sec. 11.   (AB 676)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Powers of the Commissioner [31400. - 31408.]

31400.

(a) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this law or any rule or order hereunder, the commissioner may in the commissioner’s discretion bring an action, or the commissioner may request the Attorney General to bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California, in the superior court to enjoin the acts or practices or to enforce compliance with this law or any rule or order hereunder. Upon a proper showing a permanent or preliminary injunction, restraining order or writ of mandate shall be granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant’s assets.

(b) If the commissioner determines it is in the public interest, the commissioner may include in any action authorized by subdivision (a) a claim for ancillary relief, including, but not limited to, a claim for restitution or disgorgement or damages on behalf of the persons injured by the act or practice constituting the subject matter of the action, and the court shall have jurisdiction to award that additional relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 698, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

31400.1.

In any proceeding under Section 31400, the court may prohibit, conditionally or unconditionally, and permanently or for such period of time as it shall determine, any person who violated Section 31200, 31201, or 31202 from acting as an officer or director of any franchisor if the person’s conduct demonstrates unfitness to serve as an officer or director of the franchisor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 101, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

31401.

(a) The commissioner may in his discretion (1) make such public or private investigations within or outside of this state as he deems necessary to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate any provision of this law or any rule or order hereunder or to aid in the enforcement of this law or in the prescribing of rules and forms hereunder, and (2) publish information concerning the violation of this law or any rule or order hereunder.

(b) For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this law, the commissioner or any officer designated by him may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the commissioner deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

(c) In case of contumacy by, or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to, any person, the superior court, upon application by the commissioner, may issue to the person an order requiring him to appear before the commissioner, or the officer designated by him, there to produce documentary evidence, if so ordered, or to give evidence touching the matter under investigation or in question. Failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt.

(d) No person is excused from attending and testifying or from producing any document or record before the commissioner, or in obedience to the subpoena of the commissioner or any officer designated by him, or in any proceeding instituted by the commissioner, on the ground that the testimony or evidence (documentary or otherwise) required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to a penalty or forfeiture; but no individual may be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he is compelled, after validly claiming his privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence (documentary or otherwise), except that the individual testifying is not exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury or contempt committed in testifying.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31402.

If, in the opinion of the commissioner, the offer of any franchise is subject to registration under this law and it is being, or it has been, offered for sale without the offer first being registered, the commissioner may order the franchisor or offeror of that franchise to desist and refrain from the further offer or sale of that franchise unless and until the offer has been duly registered under this law. If, after that order has been made, a request for a hearing is filed in writing within 60 days from the date of service of the order by the person to whom the order was directed, a hearing shall be held in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted under that chapter. Unless that hearing is commenced within 15 business days after the request is made (or the person affected consents to a later date), the order shall be deemed rescinded.

If that person fails to file a written request for a hearing within 60 days from the date of service of the order, the order shall be deemed a final order of the commissioner and shall not be subject to review by any court or agency, notwithstanding Section 31501.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 458, Sec. 8.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Operative January 1, 2005, by Sec. 19 of Ch. 458.)
-------------------------------------------

31403.

If, in the opinion of the commissioner, the offer of any franchise exempt from registration under this law is being or has been offered for sale without complying with Section 31201, or any other provision that provides an exemption from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 31110) of Part 2, the commissioner may order the franchisor or offeror of the franchise to desist and refrain from the further offer or sale of the franchise unless and until the offer is made in compliance with this law. If, after that order has been made, a request for a hearing is filed in writing within 60 days from the date of service of the order by the person to whom the order was directed, a hearing shall be held in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted under that chapter. Unless that hearing is commenced within 15 business days after the request is made, or the person affected consents to a later date, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

If that person fails to file a written request for a hearing within 60 days from the date of service of the order, the order shall be deemed a final order of the commissioner and shall not be subject to review by any court or agency, notwithstanding Section 31501.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 458, Sec. 9.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Operative January 1, 2005, by Sec. 19 of Ch. 458.)
-------------------------------------------

31404.

The commissioner may refer evidence that is available concerning any violation of this law or of any rule or order hereunder to the district attorney of the county in which the violation occurred, who may, with or without such a reference, institute appropriate criminal proceedings under this law. Upon request of the district attorney, the commissioner and the counsel, deputies, or assistants of the commissioner may assist the district attorney in presenting the law or facts at the trial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 936, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31405.

(a) Any person who violates any provision of this law, or who violates any rule or order made under this law, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation, which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the commissioner in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) As applied to the penalties for acts in violation of this division, the remedies provided by this section and by other sections of this division are not exclusive, and may be sought and employed in any combination to enforce the provisions of this division.

(c) No action shall be maintained to enforce any liability created under subdivision (a) unless brought before the expiration of four years after the act or transaction constituting the violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 458, Sec. 10.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Operative January 1, 2005, by Sec. 19 of Ch. 458.)
-------------------------------------------

31406.

(a) If, upon inspection or investigation, based upon a complaint or otherwise, the commissioner has cause to believe that a person is violating or has violated any provision of this division or any rule or order promulgated pursuant to this division, the commissioner may issue a citation to that person in writing describing with particularity the basis of the citation. Each citation may contain an order to desist and refrain and an assessment of an administrative penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation and shall contain reference to this section, including the provisions of subdivision (c). All penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the State Corporations Fund.

(b) The sanctions authorized under this section shall be separate from, and in addition to, all other administrative, civil, or criminal remedies.

(c) If within 60 days from the receipt of the citation, the person cited fails to notify the commissioner that the person intends to request a hearing as described in subdivision (d), the citation shall be deemed final.

(d) Any hearing under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) After the exhaustion of the review procedures provided for in this section, the commissioner may apply to the appropriate superior court for a judgment in the amount of the administrative penalty and order compelling the cited person to comply with the order of the
 commissioner. The application shall include a certified copy of the final order of the commissioner and shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment and order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 5.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31407.

(a) If, after examination or investigation, the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe that any person is conducting or has conducted business in violation of any provision of this division or related rule or order binding upon it, the commissioner may, by written order addressed to the person, direct the discontinuance of the violation. The order shall be effective immediately, but shall not become final except in accordance with subdivision (b).

(b) An order issued pursuant to this section shall not become final except after notice to the affected person of the commissioner’s intention to make the order final and of the reasons for the finding. The commissioner shall also notify the person that upon receiving a
 request the matter shall be set for hearing to commence within 15 business days after receipt of the request. The person may consent to have the hearing commence at a later date. If no hearing is requested within 60 days after the mailing or service of the required notice, and none is ordered by the commissioner, the order may become final without a hearing and that person shall immediately discontinue the practices named in the order. If a hearing is requested or ordered it shall be held in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted under that chapter. If, upon the conclusion of the hearing, it appears to the commissioner that the person is violating or has violated any provision of this division or any related rule or order binding upon it, the commissioner shall make the order of discontinuance final and the person shall immediately discontinue the practices named in the
 order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 6.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31408.

(a) If the commissioner determines it is in the public interest, the commissioner may include in any administrative action brought under this division, including a stop order, a claim for ancillary relief, including, but not limited to, a claim for rescission, restitution or disgorgement or damages on behalf of the persons injured by the act or practice constituting the subject matter of the action, and the administrative law judge shall have jurisdiction to award additional relief. The person affected may be required to attend remedial education, as directed by the commissioner.

(b) In an administrative action brought under this part the commissioner is entitled to recover costs, which in the discretion of the administrative law judge may include any amount
 representing reasonable attorney’s fees and investigative expenses for the services rendered, for deposit into the State Corporations Fund for the use of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 93.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Crimes [31410. - 31412.]

31410.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of this law, or who willfully violates any rule or order under this law, shall upon conviction be fined not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or be punished by both that fine and imprisonment; but no person may be imprisoned for the violation of any rule or order if he or she proves that he or she had no knowledge of the rule or order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 53.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

31411.

Any person who willfully employs, directly or indirectly, any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud in connection with the offer or sale of any franchise or willfully engages, directly or indirectly, in any act, practice, or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any person in connection with the offer, purchase, or sale of any franchise shall upon conviction be fined not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or be punished by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 54.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

31412.

Nothing in this law limits the power of the state to punish any person for any conduct which constitutes a crime under any other statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Service of Process [31420. - 31420.]

31420.

When any person, including any nonresident of this state, engages in conduct prohibited or made actionable by this law or any rule or order hereunder, whether or not he has filed a consent to service of process under Section 31155, and personal jurisdiction over him cannot otherwise be obtained in this state, that conduct shall be considered equivalent to his appointment of the commissioner or his successor in office to be his attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action, or proceeding against him or his successor, executor, or administrator which grows out of that conduct and which is brought under this law or any rule or order hereunder, with the same force and validity as if served on him personally. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the commissioner, but it is not effective unless (a) the plaintiff, who may be the commissioner in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by him, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the defendant or respondent at his last known address or takes other steps which are reasonably calculated to give actual notice, and (b) the plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance with this section is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the court allows.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 5. ADMINISTRATION [31500. - 31506.]

31500.

(a) The commissioner shall charge and collect the fees fixed by this section. All fees and charges collected under this section shall be transmitted to the Treasurer at least weekly, accompanied by a detailed statement thereof and shall be credited to the Financial Protection Fund.

(b) The fee for filing an application for registration of the offer of franchises under Section 31111 is one thousand eight hundred sixty-five dollars ($1,865).

(c) The fee for filing an application for renewal of a registration under Section 31121 is one thousand two hundred forty-five dollars ($1,245).

(d) The fee for filing an amendment to the application filed under Section 31111 or 31121 after the effective date of the registration of the offer of franchises, is fifty dollars ($50).

(e) The fee for filing an application for material modification under Section 31125 is fifty dollars ($50), whether or not it accompanies an application under Section 31111 or 31121.

(f) The fee for filing the initial notice of exemption under Section 31101 is one thousand two hundred forty-five dollars ($1,245) and the fee for filing each consecutive subsequent notice of exemption under these provisions is four hundred fifteen dollars ($415).

(g) The fee for filing an application for approval of a written notice of violation under Section 31303 or 31304 is one thousand eight hundred sixty-five dollars ($1,865).

(h) The fee for filing an application for registration as a franchise broker under Part 7 (commencing with Section 31520) is four hundred fifty dollars ($450).

(i) The fee for filing an application for amendment of a registration as a franchise broker under Part 7 (commencing with Section 31520) is fifty dollars ($50).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 6.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

31501.

Every final order, decision, license, or other official act of the commissioner is subject to judicial review in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31502.

The commissioner may from time to time make, amend and rescind such rules, forms, and orders as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this law, including rules and forms governing applications and reports, and defining any terms, whether or not used in this law, insofar as the definitions are not inconsistent with the provisions of this law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31503.

All rules of the commissioner, other than those relating solely to the internal administration of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, shall be made, amended, or rescinded in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11371) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 94.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31504.

(a) All applications, reports and other papers and documents filed with the commissioner under this law shall be open to public inspection, except that the commissioner may, in his discretion, withhold from public inspection any information the disclosure of which is, in the judgment of the commissioner, not necessary in the public interest or for the protection of investors. The commissioner may publish any information filed with him or obtained by him, if, in the judgment of the commissioner, such action is in the public interest. No provision of this law authorizes the commissioner or any of his assistants, clerks, or deputies to disclose any information withheld from public inspection except among themselves or when necessary or appropriate in a proceeding or investigation under this law or to other federal or state regulatory agencies. No provision of this law either creates or derogates from any privilege which exists at common law or otherwise when documentary or other evidence is sought under a subpoena directed to the commissioner or any of his assistants, clerks, or deputies.

(b) It is unlawful for the commissioner or any of his assistants, clerks, or deputies to use for personal benefit any information which is filed with or obtained by the commissioner and which is not then generally available to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31505.

Upon request and at such reasonable charges as he prescribes by rule, the commissioner shall furnish to any person photostatic or other copies (certified under his seal of office if requested) of any document which is retained as a matter of public record, except that he shall not charge or collect any fee for photostatic or other copies of any document furnished to public officers for use in their official capacity. In any judicial proceeding or prosecution, any copy so certified is prima facie evidence of the contents of the document certified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31506.

(a) The commissioner may destroy any applications or orders, together with the files and folders, as useless or obsolete, four years after the date of filing or issuance, with the approval of the Department of General Services; provided that a permanent record shall be maintained of any disciplinary action taken by the commissioner.

(b) Copies on microfilm or in other form which may be retained by the commissioner in his discretion of any records destroyed under this section shall be accepted for all purposes as equivalent to the original when certified by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 6. GENERAL PROVISIONS [31510. - 31516.]

31510.

The commissioner in his discretion may honor requests from interested persons for interpretive opinions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31511.

No provision of this law imposing any liability applies to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any rule, form, order, or any written interpretive opinion of the commissioner, or any opinion of the Attorney General, notwithstanding that the rule, form, order, or written interpretive opinion may later be amended or rescinded or be determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31512.

Any condition, stipulation or provision purporting to bind any person acquiring any franchise to waive compliance with any provision of this law or any rule or order hereunder is void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31512.1.

Any provision of a franchise agreement, franchise disclosure document, acknowledgment, questionnaire, or other writing, including any exhibit thereto, disclaiming or denying any of the following shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable:

(a) Representations made by the franchisor or its personnel or agents to a prospective franchisee.

(b) Reliance by a franchisee on any representations made by the franchisor or its personnel or agents.

(c) Reliance by a franchisee on the franchise disclosure document, including any exhibit thereto.

(d) Violations of any provision of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 728, Sec. 12.   (AB 676)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31513.

Whenever a person is entitled under this law to a hearing in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, a formal hearing before the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation may be substituted with the consent of such person and of the commissioner for such hearing before an independent hearing officer; and in that case after such hearing before the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation such person shall not be entitled to any further administrative remedy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 95.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31514.

If any provision of this law or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this law which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this law are declared to be severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31515.

Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31516.

Nothing in this law is intended to preclude the applicability of the Real Estate Law, Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000), Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, to any sale or lease of real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 7. FRANCHISE BROKERS [31520. - 31528.]

31520.

(a) A franchise broker shall register by filing online all of the following with the commissioner:

(1) A completed Uniform Franchise Broker Disclosure Document, as created and modified by the commissioner, that is signed and verified as true and correct by the filer.

(2) Any additional documents or exhibits prescribed by the commissioner.

(3) The required registration fee, as set forth in Section 31500.

(4) Copies of financial securities and insurance policies the commissioner requires the franchise broker to obtain and maintain.

(b) Subject to Section 31522, the registration shall be effective upon filing a complete application, including all required documents, and paying all applicable fees.

(c) Subject to Section 31522, a registration pursuant to this section shall expire on December 31 of the year in which the registration became effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 518, Sec. 5.   (SB 919)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, pursuant to Sec. 31528)
-------------------------------------------

31521.

(a) A registered franchise broker shall promptly notify the commissioner in writing by an application to amend the registration of any material change in the information contained in the latest Uniform Franchise Broker Disclosure Document filed by the
 franchise broker.

(b) The commissioner may by rule further define what shall be considered a material change for those purposes, and the circumstances under which an amended Uniform Franchise Broker Disclosure Document must be filed. 

(c) The commissioner may issue a stop order pursuant to Section 31522
 if the commissioner finds that any of the material changes provided pursuant to this section constitute a failure to comply with any of the provisions of this division or any rule issued by the commissioner pertaining to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 518, Sec. 5.   (SB 919)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, pursuant to Sec. 31528)
-------------------------------------------

31522.

(a) The commissioner may summarily issue a stop order suspending or revoking any registration under this part if the commissioner finds that the franchise broker has failed to comply with any of the provisions of this division or any rule issued by the commissioner pertaining to this division.

(b) A
 franchise broker shall not offer or sell a franchise in this state while a stop order issued pursuant to subdivision (a) is in effect.

(c) Upon issuance of a stop order, the commissioner shall promptly provide a notice to the franchise broker that contains all of the following:

(1) Notice that the stop order has been issued.

(2) The reasons for issuance of the stop order.

(3) Notice that the matter will be set for hearing within
 15 business days after the commissioner receives a written request for hearing from the franchise broker, unless the franchise broker consents to a later date.

(d) The commissioner may modify, vacate, or extend a stop order until there has been a final determination of the matter at the hearing.

(e) A hearing under this section shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5
 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted under those provisions.

(f) If the franchise broker does not request a hearing within 30 days after receipt of the notice required by subdivision (c), the stop order shall remain in effect until it is modified or vacated by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 518, Sec. 5.   (SB 919)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, pursuant to Sec. 31528)
-------------------------------------------

31523.

A registered franchise broker offering a franchise for sale in this state shall keep and maintain a complete set of books, records, and accounts of that offer for a period of five calendar years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 518, Sec. 5.   (SB 919)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, pursuant to Sec. 31528)
-------------------------------------------

31524.

A registered franchise broker is subject to, and shall comply with, all of the following:

(a) Section 31154.

(b) Section 31155.

(c) Section 31156.

(d) Section 31157.

(e) Section 31158.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 518, Sec. 5.   (SB 919)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, pursuant to Sec. 31528)
-------------------------------------------

31525.

(a) It is unlawful for a franchise broker to offer or sell a franchise in this state unless the franchise broker is registered pursuant to this part.

(b) For purposes of this section, an offer or sale of a franchise is made in this state if any of the following apply:

(1) The prospective franchisee resides in this state.

(2) The prospective franchisee has its principal place of business in this state.

(3) The franchised business will be located in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 518, Sec. 5.   (SB 919)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, pursuant to Sec. 31528)
-------------------------------------------

31526.

(a) It is unlawful for a franchise broker to communicate with a prospective franchisee about investing in a franchise opportunity that is subject to registration pursuant to this division unless the
 franchise broker first provides to the prospective franchisee a copy of the completed Uniform
 Franchise Broker Disclosure Document.

(b) A franchise broker may provide the Uniform Franchise Broker Disclosure Document to a prospective franchisee through electronic means, subject to any requirements or conditions imposed by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 518, Sec. 5.   (SB 919)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, pursuant to Sec. 31528)
-------------------------------------------

31527.

For purposes of this part, the Uniform Franchise Broker Disclosure Document shall contain all of the following information:

(a) A franchise broker cover page, as created and modified by the commissioner, that contains standardized language regarding
 franchise brokers, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The types of sellers.

(2) The franchise brokers’ role in the franchise sales process.

(3) Services a franchise broker
 might provide.

(4) Different ways a franchise broker might be compensated for its services.

(5) Examples of questions a prospective franchisee might ask a franchise broker.

(b) All of the following information about the
 franchise broker:

(1) Legal name.

(2) Trade name.

(3) Year and state of formation.

(4) Principal place of business.

(5) Owners.

(6) Directors and officers.

(7) Contact information.

(8) The
 franchise broker’s
 broker network or franchise sales organization.

(c) The franchise broker’s professional experience during the last five years, including, but not limited to, employers, principal positions, each position’s location, and the month and year of each position’s start date and end date.

(d) Administrative, civil, or criminal actions alleging that the franchise broker,
 or an owner, officer, or director of the franchise broker, violated any franchise, antitrust, or securities law, or committed fraud, unfair or deceptive practices, or similar violations, whether pending or resolved, within the last five years.

(e) The industries of the brands the franchise broker represents and how many brands within each industry the
 franchise broker represents.

(f) A description of the services performed by the franchise broker.

(g) How the franchise broker is compensated, including, but not limited to, how the amount of any consideration the
 franchise broker receives is calculated.

(h) Whether a broker network, broker organization, or franchise sales organization may receive any additional consideration.

(i) The brands for whom the franchise broker sold a franchise anywhere in the United States or its territories during the last calendar year for which the franchise broker received or is entitled to receive compensation, including, but not limited to, the total number of units sold for the brand.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 518, Sec. 5.   (SB 919)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, pursuant to Sec. 31528)
-------------------------------------------

31528.

The implementation of this part is contingent upon an appropriation for its purposes by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or other statute. This part shall become operative on the later of: (1) July 1, 2026, or (2) the first anniversary of the date on which the appropriation is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 518, Sec. 5.   (SB 919)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------


